Utah statutes.
26-4-15.   Deaths in medical centers and federal facilities.

All death certificates of any decedent who died in a teaching medical center or a federal medical facility unattended or in the care of an unlicensed physician or other medical personnel shall be signed by the licensed supervisory physician, attending physician or licensed resident physician of the medical center or facility.

